North Dakota, session 69, SB2049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-35-15.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-35-15.2. Information technology committee - Powers and duties.
The information technology committee has continuing existence and may meet and conduct its
business during the legislative session and in the interim between sessions. The committee shall:
1. Meet at least once each calendar quarter.
2. Receive a report from the chief information officer of the state at each meeting.
3. Review the business plan of the information technology department.
4. Review macro-level issues relating to information technology.
5. Review the activities of the information technology department.
6. Review statewide information technology standards.
7. Review the statewide information technology plan.
8. Review information technology efficiency and security.
9. Review established or proposed information technology programs and information technology
acquisition by the executive and judicial branches.
10. Except as provided in subsection 11, receive and review information, including a project
startup report summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or
problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout report summarizing the
project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from
the information technology department and the affected agency regarding any major
information technology project of an executive branch agency. For the purposes of this
subsection, a major project is aan information technology project with a total cost of five
hundred thousand dollarsthat meets one or more of the following criteria, as determined by the
chief information officer:
a. An estimated total cost, as defined by the information technology department, of five
million dollars or more;
b. Requires one year or longer to reach operational status; or
c. Requires oversight due to its potential benefits, risks, public impact, visibility, or another
significant reason.

S. B. NO. 2049 - PAGE 2
11. a. Receive and review information, including a project startup report summarizing the
project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis,
and project risks and a project closeout report summarizing the project objectives
achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from the state
board of higher education regarding any major project of the state board of higher
education or any institution under the control of the state board of higher education if the
project:
(1) Significantly impacts the statewide wide area network, including the campus access
routers;
(2) Impacts the statewide library system; or
(3) Is an administrative project. An administrative project is a project that directly
collects, aggregates, modifies, stores, or reports institutional student, financial, or
human resources records or data and is provided primarily for administrative
purposes.
b. For the purposes of this subsection, a major project is a project with a total cost of five
hundred thousand dollars or more.
12. Receive and review information from the information technology department and the affected
agency regarding any information technology project of an executive branch agency with a
total cost of between one hundred thousand and five hundred thousandmillion dollars as
determined necessary by the information technology department.
13. Receive a report from the chief information officer before October first of each even-numbered
year regarding proposed major information technology projects and other information
technology issues for the next biennium.
14. Receive and review information, including a project startup report summarizing the project
description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project
risks and a project closeout report summarizing the project objectives achieved, project
budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from the affected legislative or judicial
branch agency regarding any information technology project of the legislative or judicial
branch with a total cost of five hundred thousandmillion dollars or more.
15. Receive information from the state board of higher education regarding higher education
information technology planning, services, and major projects.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Agency" or "entity" does not include any agricultural commodity promotion group or any
occupational or professional board.
2. "Cybersecurity" means processes or capabilities, wherein, systems, communications, and
information are protected and defended against damage, unauthorized use or modification,
and exploitation.
3. "Cybersecurity strategy" means a vision, plan of action, or guiding principles. Unless otherwise
defined in this chapter, the term does not mean an associated operational plan.
4. "Department" means the information technology department.

S. B. NO. 2049 - PAGE 3
5. "Information technology" means the use of hardware, software, services, and supporting
infrastructure to manage and deliver information using voice, data, and video.
6. "Major information technology project" means a project that meets one or more of the
following criteria, as determined by the chief information officer:
a. An estimated total cost, as defined by the department, of five million dollars or more;
b. Requires one year or longer to reach operational status; or
c. Requires oversight due to its potential benefits, risks, public impact, visibility, or other
significant reason.
7. "Network services" means the equipment, software, and services necessary to transmit voice,
data, or video.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 54-59-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
8. May request and review information regarding any information technology project of an
executive branch agency with a total cost of between one hundred thousand and five hundred
thousandmillion dollars as determined necessary by the department. The department shall
present the information to the information technology committee on request of the committee.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-32. Major information technology projects - Appointment of executive steering
committeesOversight.
1. An executive branch state agency, excluding institutions under the control of the state board of
higher education, proposing to conduct a major information technology project as described in
subsection 10 of section 54-35-15.2, the department, and the office of management and
budget, in consultation with the attorney general, shall collaborate on the procurement,
contract negotiation, and contract administration of the project. The agency, the department,
and the office of management and budget, in consultation with the attorney general, shall
approve the solicitation, contract, or agreement, and any amendments relating to the project
before submission to the executive steeringoversight committee as provided in subsection 3.
2. The procurement officer and primary project manager for a major information technology
project must meet the qualifications established by the department and the office of
management and budget.
3. An executive steeringoversight committee must be appointed to oversee eacha major
information technology project. The agency project sponsorchief information officer shall serve
asappoint a chairman of the committee. The executive steeringoversight committee must
consist ofmay include the director of the office of management and budget or a designee of
the director, the chief information officer or a designee of the officer, the head of the agency
contracting for the project or a designee, the project sponsor, and a large project oversight
analyst designated by the chief information officer. The executive steeringoversight committee
shall monitor the overall status of the project and reviewmake recommendations to the head of
the agency contracting for the project or a designee, and the project sponsor, regarding
project decisions, including negotiation and execution of contracts, approval of project
budgets, implementation of project schedules, assessment of project quality, and
consideration of scope changes. Any project decision declared by a member of the committee
to be a major project decision requires at least four affirmative votes.

S. B. NO. 2049 - PAGE 4
4. An agreement or contract, including an amendment, revision, or scope change, for a major
information technology project may not be entered unless signed by the head of the
contracting agency or a designee and the chief information officer or a designee of the officer.

S. B. NO. 2049 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2049.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State